California, session 20252026, AB962.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48901.7 of the Education Code is amended to read:48901.7. (a) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, and the governing body of a charter school shall, no later than July 1, 2026, develop and adopt, and shall update every five years, a policy to limit or prohibit the use by its pupils of smartphones while the pupils are at a schoolsite or while the pupils are under the supervision and control of an employee or employees of that school district, county office of education, or charter school. The goal of the policy shall be to promote evidence-based use of smartphone practices to support pupil learning and well-being. The development of the policy shall involve significant stakeholder participation in order to ensure that the policies are responsive to the unique needs and desires of pupils, parents, and educators in each community. The policy may also include enforcement mechanisms that limit access to smartphones.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a pupil shall not be prohibited from possessing or using a smartphone under any of the following circumstances:(1) Unless explicitly addressed in a comprehensive school safety plan adopted pursuant to Section 32282, in the case of an emergency or in response to a perceived threat of danger.(2) When a teacher or administrator of the school district, county office of education, or charter school grants permission to a pupil to possess or use a smartphone, subject to any reasonable limitation imposed by that teacher or administrator.(3) When a licensed physician and surgeon determines that the possession or use of a smartphone is necessary for the health or well-being of the pupil.(4) When the possession or use of a smartphone is required in a pupil’s individualized education program.(c) This section does not authorize monitoring, collecting, or otherwise accessing any information related to a pupil’s online activities.